Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8098.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings and purpose.
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to keep the public safe when on the road. Excessive
speeding is a leading cause of traffic fatalities and injuries. Nationwide, speed was a component in
twenty-nine percent (29%) of all crash fatalities in 2022. Speeding drivers negatively impact all
who use the road, including pedestrians, bikers, and other forms of transportation. The legislature
finds that solutions are needed to keep the public safe on the road and to change public behavior.
(2) Intelligent Speed Assistance (ISA) devices offer an improved solution to address
excessive speeding. Tools utilized to reduce speeding on roadways often include issuing traffic
fines, suspending licenses, and impounding cars, but these solutions are no longer effective to
address excessive, repeated speeding. Traffic fines do not substantially deter speeding or change
behavior, and most drivers with a suspended license continue to drive. According to the American
Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators, more than seventy percent (70%) of people with
suspended licenses continue to drive during the suspension period.
(3) ISA technology enables individuals to continue driving, issues a meaningful penalty
and facilitates driver education and training to create safer driving habits. By leveraging technology
to enable individuals to continue driving, while preventing speeding, the legislature intends to
enhance road safety to promote safer driving habits and keep the public safe, all of which work to
directly address the issue of speeding on our roads

(4) The Legislature finds that utilizing ISA devices for high-risk drivers, particularly those
with repeated speed-related violations, can prevent recidivism and provide long term traffic safety
improvements.
SECTION 2. Title 31 of the General Laws entitled "MOTOR AND OTHER VEHICLES"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 27.2
SUPER SPEEDER ACCOUNTABILITY ACT
31-27.2-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Super Speeder Accountability Act."
31-27.2-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the department of motor vehicles, which oversees drivers
licensing and license suspensions resulting from failure to pay fines or appear in traffic court.
(2) "Eligible offender" means a person whose license has been suspended due to a district
court conviction or administrative finding by the traffic tribunal of excessive speeding, racing, or
reckless driving where speed was a factor, or a person who has been convicted of multiple moving
offenses and is subject to the provisions of § 31-27-24.
(3) "Excessive speeding" means traveling at twenty miles per hour (20 mph) or greater in
excess of the posted speed limit, if the posted speed limit is forty miles per hour (40 mph) or less;
and thirty miles per hour (30 mph) or greater in excess of the posted speed limit, if the posted speed
limit is greater than forty miles per hour (40 mph).
(4) "Intelligent speed assistance device" or "ISA device" means an aftermarket device that
uses GPS to actively limit the vehicle's speed to posted or pre-set speed limits. Devices shall be
tamper resistant and capable of reporting attempts to disable or circumvent functionality. Active
"intelligent speed assistance device" shall not include any technology that is provided by the vehicle
manufacturer as a component of a new motor vehicle and that controls or affects the speed of a
motor vehicle.
(5) "Rhode Island traffic tribunal" means the court which has original jurisdiction over civil
traffic offenses committed in Rhode Island.
31-27.2-3. Mandatory use of ISA devices.
(a) The Rhode Island traffic tribunal or district court shall require installation and use of an
ISA device as a condition for license reinstatement for any eligible offender.
(1) If a person's license has been suspended pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the
terms of restricted or revoked license reinstatement shall require the person to use a properly
LC005919 - Page 2 of 6

functioning intelligent speed assistance device while operating a motor vehicle.
(2) If a person has been convicted of multiple moving offenses and is subject to the
provisions of § 31-27-34, the person shall be ordered to install an ISA device as a condition of
keeping operating privileges.
(3) A person subject to the requirements in subsection (a) of this section shall not operate
any motor vehicle without a properly functioning ISA device installed in the vehicle for the duration
of the restricted license.
(4) A person subject to the requirements in subsection (a) of this section shall provide proof
of ISA installation to the traffic tribunal through a form approved by the department from an ISA
vendor.
(b) The offender shall bear the cost of leasing, installing, removing and maintaining the
ISA device.
(c) The ISA device shall be operational on any vehicle the offender operates for a period
of not less than twelve (12) months following reinstatement.
31-27.2-4. Certification and installation.
(a) To be eligible to install, repair, maintain, monitor, or remove an intelligent speed
assistance device, an entity shall apply to the department and meet the requirements as provided in
this section.
(b) An applicant seeking approval to install the device shall submit a declaration to the
department that the device is an intelligent speed assistance device as defined in this chapter.
(c) To maintain eligibility under this section, a certified ISA or ignition interlock device
provider or installer shall submit the results of a criminal background check to the department
annually for any individual that is hired to install, repair, maintain, monitor, or remove the device.
(d) Only certified ISA devices and installers of ISA devices and ignition interlock devices
shall be used to meet the requirements of this chapter.
(e) The department shall adopt regulations governing the certification of ISA device
providers and installers.
31-27.2-5. Program administration.
The department shall establish procedures for issuing restricted licenses:
(1) Notifying offenders of ISA requirements;
(2) Verifying installation and continued functionality of ISA devices; and
(3) Monitoring compliance and responding to violations.
31-27.2-6. Penalties for noncompliance.
(a) A person who is restricted to the use of a vehicle equipped with an intelligent speed
LC005919 - Page 3 of 6

assistance device is noncompliant if the restricted driver:
(1) Tampers with the device or any components of the device, or otherwise interferes with
the proper functionality of the device, by modifying, detaching, disconnecting, or otherwise
disabling it to allow the restricted driver to operate the vehicle;
(2) Has, directs, authorizes, or requests another person to tamper with the ISA device or
any components of the device, or otherwise interfere with the proper functionality of the device, by
modifying, detaching, disconnecting, or otherwise disabling it to allow the restricted driver to
operate the vehicle;
(3) Operates a vehicle without a required ISA device; or
(4) Fails to return the device to the vendor upon program completion.
(b) Penalties for noncompliance under this chapter shall be:
(1) Immediate re-suspension or revocation of driving privileges; and
(2) Extension of the ISA requirement for an additional six (6) months;
(c) If an individual is found to be noncompliant and chooses to instead cede all driving
privileges, the individual's license is suspended or revoked entirely and shall submit an affidavit of
nondriving to the department.
(d) Non-restricted license reinstatement shall not occur until the user has satisfied the
period of time required by the court or department to use the device without incurring additional
time penalties or has completed the required time utilizing the device following additional time
penalties.
31-27.2-7. Liability clarifications.
(a) A manufacturer, distributor or retailer of a motor vehicle shall not be liable for any loss,
injury, or damages caused by the design, manufacture, installation, improper installation, use, or
misuse of an aftermarket intelligent speed assistance device. Provided, however, liability does exist
if the manufacturer, distributor or retailer of a motor vehicle knowingly engages in a repair or
update to the aftermarket intelligent speed assistance device and such repair or update proximately
causes loss, injury or damage.
(b) Nothing in this chapter requires a manufacturer, distributor or retailer of a motor vehicle
to manufacture, distribute, or offer for sale a motor vehicle that includes or is compatible with an
aftermarket intelligent speed assistance device.
(c) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a lessor or lienholder from requiring that a motor
vehicle lessee or owner notify the lessor or lienholder that an aftermarket intelligent speed
assistance device has been installed on a motor vehicle that is subject to a lease or finance
agreement.
LC005919 - Page 4 of 6

31-27.2-8. Data collection.
(a) All data collected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be securely maintained
by the ISA device provider. Data related to violations involving tampering with, circumventing, or
removing the ISA device shall be sent by notice to the department or the judge who ordered the
installation of the device.
(b) Data collected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may only be disclosed under
the following circumstances:
(1) When required by a court order;
(2) As directed by a state statute or regulation.
(3) With the department or provided to the traffic court in cases involving alleged violations
for tampering with, circumventing, or removing the device; or
(4) If the data is depersonalized and aggregated for research or evaluation purposes.
31-27.2-9. Reporting and evaluation.
(a) The department shall submit an annual report to the governor, speaker of the house and
the senate president summarizing program data, including recidivism rates, and user compliance.
(b) The department may adjust implementation based on findings and emerging best
practices in ISA technology.
31-27.2-10. Rulemaking authority.
The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the
provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage..
========
LC005919
========
LC005919 - Page 5 of 6